Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-246
Town treasurer; bond; amount; forfeiture; right of action.

The town treasurer of each town shall give bond to the town in the sum of two thousand dollars, or double the amount of money that may come into his hands, to be fixed by the town board. Whenever it shall be ascertained that such bond has been forfeited, suit in the name of such town on said bond may be brought by any resident freeholder of such town.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 44, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 1030;

C.S.1922, § 932;

C.S.1929, § 26-246;

R.S.1943, § 23-246.